Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2746.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [626.5536] LAW ENFORCEMENT REQUIRED TO REGISTER FOR ETRACE SYSTEM AND TRACE AND REPORT ON RECOVERED OR CONFISCATED FIREARMS. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin As used in this section, "recovered or confiscated" means any of the following: new text end new text begin (1) obtained from a crime scene or in connection with a criminal investigation; new text end new text begin (2) seized by a law enforcement agency; new text end new text begin (3) forfeited to a law enforcement agency; new text end new text begin (4) acquired by a law enforcement agency as an abandoned or discarded firearm; new text end new text begin (5) obtained following the unlawful discharge of a firearm; or new text end new text begin (6) otherwise obtained and reasonably believed to be connected to a crime. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Reporting required. new text end new text begin (a) Each law enforcement agency shall register for the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives National Tracing Center's eTrace system, and opt-in to the system's collective data sharing feature. new text end new text begin (b) Whenever a firearm is recovered or confiscated by a law enforcement agency, the agency must, as soon as practicable: new text end new text begin (1) transmit information relating to the firearm to the eTrace system; and new text end new text begin (2) arrange for the firearm to be test fired and the results submitted to the National Integrated Ballistics Information Network. new text end new text begin (c) Whenever a shell casing is recovered or confiscated by a law enforcement agency, that agency must, as soon as practicable, submit the ballistics information to the National Integrated Ballistics Information Network. new text end